Hawaii statutes.
§103-11 Rules of comptroller. The
comptroller shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 as necessary, for the
purposes of this chapter. Any violation of the rules shall be subject to the
penalties prescribed in section 103-9. [L 1911, c 47, §2; RL 1925, §1485; RL
1935, §115; RL 1945, §372; RL 1955, §9-7; am L 1957, c 152, §1; am L 1965, c
96, §3; HRS §103-11; am L 1999, c 149, §6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next